Alabama, session 2026rs, HB368.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF ALABAMA:
Section 1. Effective for the general election in 2028,
the members of the Randolph County Commission representing
Districts 1, 3, and 5 shall be elected for terms of two years
and the other members shall be elected for terms of four
years. Thereafter, at the general election preceding the
expiration of the term of any member of the commission, any
successor shall be elected for a term of four years.
Section 2. This act shall become effective on October
1, 2026.
Page 1

1, 2026.
HB368 Enrolled








________________________________________________
Speaker of the House of Representatives



________________________________________________
President and Presiding Officer of the Senate


House of Representatives

I hereby certify that the within Act originated in and
was passed by the House 10-Feb-26.

John Treadwell
Clerk





Senate 19-Feb-26 Passed



Page 2